ottoman_verb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +P1S +P2S +P3S +P1P +P2P +P3P +Positive +Negative +Aorist +Continuous

LEXICON Root
Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

گيت   NegationInceDuz;
سو   NegationInceDuz;
گور NegationInceYuvarlak;
سور NegationInceYuvarlak;
آل  NegationKalinDuz;
قال NegationKalinDuz;
قوش  NegationKalinYuvarlak;
اويو NegationKalinYuvarlak;
اوقو NegationKalinYuvarlak;


LEXICON NegationInceDuz

+Positive:0            TensePosInceDuz;
+Negative:0          TenseNegInceDuz;

LEXICON NegationInceYuvarlak

+Positive:0            TensePosInceYuvarlak;
+Negative:0          TenseNegInceYuvarlak;

LEXICON NegationKalinDuz

+Positive:0            TensePosKalinDuz;
+Negative:0          TenseNegKalinDuz;

LEXICON NegationKalinYuvarlak

+Positive:0            TensePosKalinYuvarlak;
+Negative:0          TenseNegKalinYuvarlak;


LEXICON TensePosInceDuz

+Aorist:^ر           Person;
+Continuous:^ييور       Person;

LEXICON TensePosInceYuvarlak

+Aorist:^ور           Person;
+Continuous:^ويور       Person;

LEXICON TensePosKalinDuz

+Aorist:^ر           Person;
+Continuous:^ييور       Person;

LEXICON TensePosKalinYuvarlak

+Aorist:^ور           Person;
+Continuous:^ويور       Person;

LEXICON TenseNegInceDuz

+Aorist:^مز           Person;
+Continuous:^مييور       Person;

LEXICON TenseNegInceYuvarlak

+Aorist:^مز           Person;
+Continuous:^مييور       Person;

LEXICON TenseNegKalinDuz

+Aorist:^ماز           Person;
+Continuous:^مييور       Person;

LEXICON TenseNegKalinYuvarlak

+Aorist:^ماز           Person;
+Continuous:^مييور       Person;

LEXICON Person

+P1S:^م         #;
+P2S:^سڭ        #;
+P3S:0           #;
+P1P:^ز      #;
+P2P:^سڭز    #;
+P3P:0         #;
+P3P:^لر      #;

! TODO

! LEXICON TensePos

! +Aorist:^ر           Person;
! +Past:^DH             PersonPast;
! +PastP:^mHş           Person;
! +Future:^YAcAk        Person;
! +Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
! +Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
! +Must:^mAlI           Person;
! +Desire:^YA           PersonPast;
! +Condition:^sA        PersonPast;
! +Imperative:0         PersonImp;
! 
! ! LEXICON TensePos
! ! 
! ! +Aorist:^Hr           ComTense1;
! ! +PastP:^mHş           ComTense1;
! ! +Future:^YAcAk        ComTense1;
! ! +Continuous:^Hyor     ComTense1;
! ! +Continuous:^mAktAY	  ComTense1;
! ! +Must:^mAlIy          ComTense1;
! ! +Past:^DHy            ComTense2;
! ! +Condition:^sAy       ComTense3;
! ! +Possibility:^YAbil   ComTense4;
! ! 
!LEXICON TenseNeg

!+Aorist:^Z            PersonAor;
! ! +Past:^DH             PersonPast;
! ! +PastP:^mHş           Person;
! ! +Future:^YAcAk        Person;
! ! +Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
! ! +Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
! ! +Must:^mAlI           Person;
! ! +Desire:^YA           PersonPast;
! ! +Condition:^sA        PersonPast;
! ! +Imperative:0         PersonImp;
! ! 
! ! LEXICON TenseNeg
! ! 
! ! +Aorist:^Z            ComTense1;
! ! +PastP:^mHş           ComTense1;
! ! +Future:^YAcAk        ComTense1;
! ! +Continuous:^Hyor     ComTense1;
! ! +Continuous:^mAktAY	  ComTense1;
! ! +Must:^mAlIy          ComTense1;
! ! +Past:^DHy            ComTense2;
! ! +Condition:^sAy       ComTense3;
! ! +Possibility:^YAbil   ComTense4;
! ! 
! ! LEXICON ComTense1
! ! 
! ! +Past:^DH       PersonPast;
! ! +PastP:^mHş     Person;
! ! +Condition:^sA  PersonPast;
! ! 
! ! LEXICON ComTense2
! ! 
! ! +Past:^DH       PersonPast;
! ! +Condition:^sA  PersonPast;
! ! 
! ! LEXICON ComTense3
! ! 
! ! +Past:^DH       PersonPast;
! ! +PastP:^mHş     Person;
! ! 
! ! LEXICON ComTense4
! ! 
! ! +Aorist:^Hr           Person;
! ! +Past:^DH             PersonPast;
! ! +PastP:^mHş           Person;
! ! +Future:^AcAk         Person;
! ! +Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
! ! +Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
! ! +Must:^mAlI           Person;
! ! +Condition:^sA        PersonPast;
! 
! LEXICON Person
! 
! +1person:^Hm         #;
! +2person:^SHn        #;
! +3person:0           #;
! +1personPl:^YHz      #;
! +2personPl:^SHnHz    #;
! +3personPl:0         #;
! +3personPl:^lAr      #;
! 
! LEXICON PersonImp
! 
! +2person:0         #;
! +2personPl:^YHn    #;
! +2personPl:^YHnHz  #;
! +3person:^sHn      #;
! +3personPl:^sHnlAr #;
! 
! LEXICON PersonAor
! 
! 1person:^m         #;     
! 2person:^sIn       #;
! 3person:0          #;
! 1personPl:^Iz      #;
! 2personPl:^sInIz   #;
! 3personPl:0        #;
! 3personPl:^lAr     #;
! 
! LEXICON PersonPast
! 
! +1person:^m        #;
! +2person:^n        #;
! +3person:0         #;
! +1personPl:^k      #;
! +2personPl:^HnHz   #;
! +3personPl:0       #;
! +3personPl:^lAr    #;
